Arkansas, session 2025, SB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 28, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
12-28-110. Facility to house county jail backlog.
(a) The Board of Corrections may purchase, fund, construct, expand, or
improve a facility to house inmates sentenced to the Division of Correction
who are awaiting transfer to a prison:
(1) In a county that is one (1) of the eight (8) counties that
contribute the most inmates to the total inmate population in the custody of
the division; or
*CEB066*
03-11-2025 10:32:52 CEB066

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S3/11/25 SB144
(2) Upon the approval of the quorum court of the county, in a
county that adjoins one (1) of the eight (8) counties that contribute the
most inmates to the total inmate population in the custody of the division.
(b) The division shall determine the eight (8) eligible counties under
subsection (a) of this section based upon the total inmate population that
existed as of January 1, 2025.

12-28-111. Diagnostic intake facility.
(a) The Division of Correction, with the approval of the Board of
Corrections, shall provide a correctional facility in Washington County,
Benton County, Crawford County, or Sebastian County to carry out the
diagnostic intake process for new adult inmates.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not prohibit the use of
another correctional facility to carry out the diagnostic intake process for
new adult inmates.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 41, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-41-512. County jail-state inmate close-to-home sentencing
partnership.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Board of
Corrections and one (1) or more county may enter into a county jail-state
inmate close-to-home sentencing partnership agreement to fund, construct,
expand, or improve a facility to house inmates of the jail or to house
inmates sentenced to the Division of Correction who are awaiting transfer to
a prison.
(b) An agreement under subsection (a) of this section is subject to
the following requirements:
(1)(A) At least one (1) county entering the county jail-state
inmate close-to-home sentencing partnership agreement shall be:
(i) One (1) of the eight (8) counties that
contribute the most inmates to the total population in the custody of the
division; or
(ii) A county that adjoins one (1) of the eight (8)
counties that contribute the most inmates to the total population in the
custody of the division.
03-11-2025 10:32:52 CEB066

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S3/11/25 SB144
(B) The division shall determine the eight (8) eligible
counties based upon the total inmate population that existed as of January 1,
2025;
(2) If more than (1) county enters into the county jail-state
inmate close-to-home sentencing partnership agreement, all counties entering
the agreement shall adjoin each other; and
(3) The county jail-state inmate close-to-home sentencing
partnership agreement shall be approved by a vote of the quorum court of each
county entering the agreement.
(c) In addition to any sources of funding provided by law, the costs
associated with funding, constructing, expanding, or improving a facility
pursuant to a county jail-state inmate close-to-home sentencing partnership
agreement under this section may be provided from funds authorized by the
General Assembly.
(d) A county jail-state inmate close-to-home sentencing partnership
agreement under this section must be approved by the quorum court of a county
before June 30, 2027.

/s/B. King

















03-11-2025 10:32:52 CEB066